Wyoming, session 2026, HB0184.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 14-6-253 is created to read:

14-6-253. Deferral of criminal proceedings;
juveniles.

(a) If a juvenile who has not been previously
convicted of any misdemeanor or felony is charged with,
found guilty of or pleads guilty or no contest to any
HB0184

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0483
misdemeanor that the district attorney deems, following
assessment as the single point of contact for the juvenile
system, not treatable under the other provisions of title
14 of the Wyoming statutes, the circuit court may, with the
consent of the juvenile and the state and without entering
a judgment of guilt or conviction, defer further
proceedings and place the juvenile on probation for a term
of not more than eighteen (18) months upon terms and
conditions set by the circuit court. The terms of probation
shall require that the juvenile:

(i) Report to the circuit court not less than
two (2) times each year at times and places fixed by court
order;

(ii) Act in a law-abiding manner;

(iii) Not leave the state without the consent of
the circuit court;

(iv) Follow any other terms of probation the
circuit court finds proper; and

HB0184

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0483
(v) Pay restitution to each victim in accordance
with W.S. 7-9-101 through 7-9-115.

(b) If the circuit court finds the juvenile has
fulfilled the terms of probation and that the juvenile has
been rehabilitated to the satisfaction of the circuit
court, the circuit court may at the end of eighteen (18)
months, or at any time more than six (6) months after
originally placing the juvenile on probation, discharge the
juvenile from probation and dismiss each charge.

(c) If the juvenile violates a term or condition of
probation at any time before the final discharge of the
charges, the circuit court may take one (1) of the
following actions:

(i) Enter an adjudication of guilt and
conviction and proceed to impose a sentence upon the
juvenile if the juvenile previously pled guilty or was
found guilty of the original charge or charges for which
probation was granted under this section;

HB0184

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0483
(ii) Order that the trial of the original charge
proceed if the juvenile has not previously pled or been
found guilty; or

(iii) Order that the matter be transferred to
the juvenile court pursuant to a proceeding conducted in
accordance with W.S. 14-6-237.

(d) Discharge and dismissal under this section shall
be without adjudication of guilt and is not a conviction
for any purpose.

(e) There shall be only one (1) discharge and
dismissal under this section for juveniles who have not yet
reached eighteen (18) years of age at the time the crime
was committed.

Section 2. W.S. 1-40-119(b), 5-9-134, 5-12-116,
5-12-118(b), 6-10-102, 6-10-103, 7-9-101(a)(i),
7-13-301(e), 7-13-1202(a)(iv), 7-13-1301(a)(iii),
7-13-1303(a), 21-2-802(g)(i) and 31-5-233(f)(intro) and
(ii) are amended to read:

HB0184

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0483
1-40-119. Surcharge to be assessed in certain
criminal cases; paid to account.

(b) The surcharge enumerated in subsection (a) of
this section shall be imposed upon any defendant for whom
prosecution, trial or sentence is deferred under W.S.
7-13-301 and 7-13-302 or 14-6-253 or who participates in
any other diversion agreement.

5-9-134. Probation; correction and reduction of
sentence.

The circuit court may place a criminal defendant on
probation pursuant to W.S. 7-13-301 through 7-13-307 or
14-6-253. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
probation period for a defendant whose disposition includes
participation in a substance abuse treatment program or a
court supervised treatment program may exceed the maximum
term of imprisonment established for the offense, but shall
not exceed three (3) years. The court shall conduct, on at
least a monthly basis, a review on the progress of a
defendant sentenced to treatment under this section. The
review may be conducted in a manner the court deems
HB0184

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0483
appropriate, but shall include receiving regular progress
reports from the treatment provider.

5-12-116. Municipal courts.

A municipal judge may place a criminal defendant on
probation pursuant to W.S. 7-13-301 through 7-13-307 or
14-6-253 and require the defendant as a probationary
condition to participate in a program under this act.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the probation
period for a defendant whose disposition includes
participation in a program or a court supervised treatment
program may exceed the maximum term of imprisonment
established for the offense, but shall not exceed
thirty-six (36) months.

5-12-118. Surcharge to be assessed in certain
criminal cases; paid to account.

(b) The surcharge may be imposed upon any defendant
for whom prosecution, trial or sentence is deferred under
W.S. 7-13-301 and 7-13-302, 14-6-253 or 35-7-1037 or who
HB0184

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0483
participates in any other diversion agreement for an
offense specified in subsection (a) of this section.

6-10-102. Imposition of fine for any felony; maximum
fine where not established by statute; court automation
fee; indigent civil legal services fee.

The court may impose a fine as part of the punishment for
any felony. If the statute does not establish a maximum
fine, the fine shall be not more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000.00). The court shall impose a court automation fee
of forty dollars ($40.00) in every criminal case wherein
the defendant is found guilty, enters a plea of guilty or
no contest or is placed on probation under W.S. 7-13-301 or
14-6-253. The fee shall be remitted as provided by W.S.
5-3-205. In addition to the court automation fee the court
shall impose an indigent civil legal services fee of ten
dollars ($10.00) in every criminal case wherein the
defendant is found guilty, enters a plea of guilty or no
contest or is placed on probation under W.S. 7-13-301,
14-6-253 or 35-7-1037. The indigent civil legal services
fee shall be remitted as provided in W.S. 5-3-205(a)(ii).

HB0184

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0483
6-10-103. Penalties for misdemeanors where not
prescribed by statute; court automation fee; indigent civil
legal services fee.

Unless a different penalty is prescribed by law, every
crime declared to be a misdemeanor is punishable by
imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6)
months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00), or both. The court shall impose a court
automation fee of forty dollars ($40.00) in every criminal
case wherein the defendant is found guilty, enters a plea
of guilty or no contest or is placed on probation under
W.S. 7-13-301 or 14-6-253. The fee shall be remitted as
provided by W.S. 5-3-205. In addition to the court
automation fee the court shall impose an indigent civil
legal services fee of ten dollars ($10.00) in every
criminal case wherein the defendant is found guilty, enters
a plea of guilty or no contest or is placed on probation
under W.S. 7-13-301 or 14-6-253. The indigent civil legal
services fee shall be remitted as provided in W.S.
5-3-205(a)(ii).

7-9-101. Definitions.
HB0184

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0483

(a) As used in this chapter:

(i) "Criminal activity" means any crime for
which there is a plea of guilty, nolo contendere or verdict
of guilty upon which a judgment of conviction may be
rendered and includes any other crime which is admitted by
the defendant, whether or not prosecuted. In the case of
restitution ordered under W.S. 7-13-301 or 14-6-253,
"criminal activity" also includes a crime charged against
the defendant;

7-13-301. Placing person found guilty, but not
convicted, on probation.

(e) There shall be only one (1) discharge and
dismissal under this section or under any similar section
of the probationary statutes of any other jurisdiction. Use
of a criminal deferral under W.S. 14-6-253 shall not be
considered a discharge and dismissal under this subsection.

7-13-1202. Definitions.

HB0184

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0483
(a) As used in this act:

(iv) "Teen court" or "teen court program" means
an alternative sentencing procedure under which regular
court proceedings involving a teen charged with a minor
offense may be deferred and subsequently dismissed on
condition that the defendant participate fully in the teen
court program and appear before a jury of teen peers for
sentencing and that the defendant successfully complete the
terms and conditions of the sentence imposed. This
sentencing is in addition to the provisions of W.S.
7-13-301, 14-6-253 and 35-7-1037;

7-13-1301. Definitions.

(a) As used in W.S. 7-13-1301 through 7-13-1304:

(iii) "Convicted" means an unvacated
determination of guilt by any court having legal
jurisdiction of the offense and from which no appeal is
pending and includes pleas of guilty and nolo contendere.
For purposes of W.S. 7-13-1302 only, "convicted" shall
include dispositions pursuant to W.S. 7-13-301,
HB0184

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0483
7-13-302(a), 35-7-1037 or deferred prosecutions when
ordered. Otherwise, for purposes of this act, "convicted"
shall not include dispositions pursuant to W.S. 7-13-301,
7-13-302(a), 14-6-253, 35-7-1037 or deferred prosecutions;

7-13-1303. Suspended sentence for qualified
offenders.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this
section, notwithstanding any other provision of law,
qualified offenders may be placed on probation under W.S.
7-13-301 or 14-6-253, receive a suspended sentence under
W.S. 7-13-302(a) or placed on probation under W.S.
35-7-1037. The sentence or probation order shall set forth
the terms of a treatment program based upon the substance
use disorder assessment and any other terms and conditions
as the court may deem appropriate under the circumstances,
and require the offender to satisfactorily complete the
treatment program. The court shall include in the sentence
or probation order any provisions necessary to reasonably
protect the health of the offender.

HB0184

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0483
21-2-802. Powers and duties; teacher certification;
suspension and revocation; certification fees; disposition
of collected fees; required data submissions to department
of education.

(g) For purposes of this section:

(i) "Convicted" or "conviction" means an
unvacated determination of guilt by any court having legal
jurisdiction of the offense and from which no appeal is
pending. Pleas of guilty and nolo contendere shall be
deemed convictions for the purposes of this section.
Dispositions pursuant to W.S. 7-13-301, 14-6-253 or
35-7-1037 shall not be convictions for purposes of this
section;

31-5-233. Driving or having control of vehicle while
under influence of intoxicating liquor or controlled
substances; penalties.

(f) Any person convicted under this section or other
law prohibiting driving while under the influence as
defined in W.S. 31-5-233(a)(v), or whose prosecution under
HB0184

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0483
this section is deferred under W.S. 7-13-301 or 14-6-253,
shall, in addition to the penalty imposed:

(ii) Except as provided in subsection (n) of
this section, for a first conviction, or for a prosecution
deferred under W.S. 7-13-301 or 14-6-253, where the
department's administrative action indicates the person had
an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of one
percent (0.15%) or more, operate only vehicles equipped
with an ignition interlock device, pursuant to W.S.
31-7-401 through 31-7-404, for a period of six (6) months.
For purposes of this paragraph, the department's
administrative action shall be deemed to indicate a person
had an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of
one percent (0.15%) or more only after the person is
notified of and given the opportunity to pursue the
administrative procedures provided by W.S. 31-7-105;

Section 3. This act shall apply to juveniles who
commit misdemeanors within this state on or after July 1,
2026.

HB0184

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0483
Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0184